imperfect.regex
[%^ ? -> []];

[t t -> t e t, d t -> d e t || _ ?* .#.];
[d t -> [], s t -> [] || _ e n];
[s s s -> s s];

[a -> i e || _ %^ 1 ];
[a -> u || _ %^ 2 ];
[e -> a || _ %^ 3, _ %^ 4, _ %^ m ];
[e i -> i || _ %^ 5 ];
[e i -> i e || _ %^ 6 ];
[i -> a || _ %^ 7, _ %^ 8 ];
[i e -> o || _ %^ 9 ];
